apertium-en-af/apertium-en-af.af.dix
  <pardef n="m/ag__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ag</l>
          <r>ag<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>ag</l>
          <r>ag<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>og</l>
          <r>ag<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="w/il__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>il<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>il<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ou</l>
          <r>il<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
  </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="mag"><i>m</i><par n="m/ag__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="wil"><i>w</i><par n="w/il__vbmod"/></e>
